Vermont statutes. Title 19 Highways
Chapter 1. State Highway Law; General Transportation Provisions
§ 33.
Survey of existing highways; damages.

For the purposes of this and the following section of this title, the word “survey” means:

a survey of the existing highway where no previous survey has been properly recorded or the record of a previous survey has not been preserved, or the terminations and boundaries of a previous survey cannot be determined; or

a resurvey to reproduce a previous survey or surveys.

The Agency, for State highways, and the selectboard, for town highways, may authorize the survey of existing highways, and the rights-of-way, easements, or fee title associated with those highways. The purpose of the survey shall be to verify the location and width of the existing right-of-way, easement, or fee title and to determine the extent of the interest of the public in the title. A notice of intent to survey an existing highway shall be sent to all known abutting landowners by certified mail. In performance of the survey, the Agency or selectboard shall attempt to determine from all available evidence the type of highway, its location on the ground, its width, and the record title holder. The survey shall be based on all available evidence, including survey descriptions, original survey bills, plats, plans, maps, photographs, discontinuances, court documents, Public Service Board orders, actions by the selectboard, existing monumentation, present road location, nearby intersections, topography, vegetation, past and current use patterns, and other additional information generally relied on by land surveyors. The surveys shall be carried out in accordance with the provisions of 26 V.S.A. chapter 45.

If, during the performance of the survey process under this section, the location or limits, or both, of the right-of-way, easement, or fee title cannot be determined on the ground from the available evidence, the Agency or the selectboard may instead cause a survey to be made of the centerline of the existing traveled way and a width of one and one-half rods on each side of the centerline shall be assumed and controlled for highway purposes.

Once a survey is completed, the Agency or selectboard shall cause the right-of-way, easement, or fee title to be monumented in accordance with the survey plat and in such a manner that will allow its limits to be readily apparent to all adjacent property owners. Monumentation shall be permanent and shall include not less than two intervisible monuments located on, within, or adjacent to the highway limits. Intervisible monuments shall be at intervals of not more than 200 meters. All monuments shall be referenced to the Vermont State Plane Coordinate System in accordance with applicable statutes and standards in effect.

The Agency or selectboard shall have the survey placed on record in the town clerk’s office in each town in which the survey is performed. The record shall include survey plats prepared and filed in accordance with

27 V.S.A. §§ 1401-1406

, a written description of the survey, and an opinion naming the record title holder. The description and plat shall include coordinates referenced to the Vermont State Plane Coordinate System. All recorded or filed material shall be indexed.

Notice of the completion of the survey shall be sent to all known abutting landowners by certified mail, not less than 30 days before the survey results are filed with the appropriate town clerk, together with notice of statutory rights of appeal and damages.

Upon recordation of the survey and upon final disposition of statutory appeals, all abutting and surrounding lands outside the limits of the survey shall be deemed discontinued, unless any rights deemed necessary are expressly reserved and clearly shown on the recorded survey plat. Title to the discontinued property shall belong to the owners of the abutting lands. If it is located between the lands of two different owners, it shall be returned to the lots to which it originally belonged, if they can be determined; if not, it shall be equally divided between the owners of the lands on each side.

A property owner aggrieved by a survey may seek damages for the loss of property or for the loss of an interest in property.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1993, No. 195

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2021, No. 20

, § 87.

§ 34.
Appeal from survey.

A person who has title to land abutting to a highway that is surveyed by the Agency or the selectboard and who is dissatisfied with the survey may appeal the results of the survey in the Superior Court in the county in which the affected property is located. Any such appeal must be brought within 120 days from the date the results of the survey are filed with the town clerk. The results of the survey shall be binding against any property owner who does not appeal within the 120-day period.

On a motion of a person, or the Agency, or upon order of the court, any person who has a legally recorded interest in the property that is the subject of the Superior Court action may be joined as a party at any time before final determination, upon such terms as the court may prescribe.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1993, No. 195

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 35.
Entrance upon lands for survey.

Employees or agents of the Agency, a municipality, or a utility authorized by law shall be allowed to enter a property for the purpose of making the necessary surveys and examinations for construction of or improvements and repairs to transportation and utility facilities, doing as little damage as possible, subject to liability for actual damages. Whenever practicable, advance notice of the proposed survey or examination shall be given to the owner or occupant of the property to be entered. No owner or occupant of property entered upon under authority of this section shall be liable for any property damage or personal injury resulting from work done by the Agency, a municipality, or a utility under authority of this section.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1995, No. 60

, § 40, eff. April 25, 1995;

1995, No. 183

(Adj. Sess.), § 18i, eff. May 22, 1996.

§ 36.
Repealed. 2005, No. 80, § 48(a).

§ 37.
Impoundments of water created by beaver.

Transportation Board jurisdiction. On petition of the Agency of Transportation, the legislative body of an affected municipality, or the owner or operator of an affected railroad or sponsor of an affected public airport, or on its own motion, the Transportation Board may, after notice and hearing under 3 V.S.A. chapter 25, issue an order requiring the removal or abatement of an impoundment of water created by beaver that threatens to substantially damage or submerge a highway, railroad, or public airport. Notice shall be given to the owner or owners of affected land, the legislative body of the affected municipality, and the Secretary of the Agency of Natural Resources. If the Board determines that an impoundment of water created by beaver threatens to substantially damage or submerge a highway, railroad, or public airport, its order shall direct that the impoundment be abated, with as minimal impact on affected land and natural resources as possible, or if necessary, removed. Persons taking action pursuant to an order of the Board under this subsection shall be exempted from the requirements of

10 V.S.A. § 905(7)

.

Superior Court jurisdiction. The Transportation Board, the Agency of Transportation, the legislative body of an affected municipality, the owner or operator of an affected railroad or the sponsor of an affected public airport may petition a Superior judge for an emergency order for the removal or abatement of an impoundment of water created by beaver that presents an imminent threat to public safety by substantially damaging or submerging a highway, railroad or public airport. Rule 65 of the Vermont Rules of Civil Procedure shall apply to proceedings under this section. In addition to notice required under Rule 65, notice shall be given to the affected municipality and to the Secretary of the Agency of Natural Resources.

HISTORY:

Added

1991, No. 134

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 17, 1992.

§ 38.
Transportation Alternatives Grant Program.

, (b)[Repealed.]

(c)

The Transportation Alternatives Grant Program is created. The Grant Program shall be administered by the Agency, and shall be funded in the amount provided for in

23 U.S.C. § 133(h)

, less the funds set aside for the Recreational Trails Program. Awards shall be made to eligible entities as defined under

23 U.S.C. § 133(h)

, and awards under the Grant Program shall be limited to the activities authorized under federal law and shall not exceed $300,000.00 per grant allocation.

(d)

Eligible entities awarded a grant must provide all funds required to match federal funds awarded for a Transportation Alternatives project. All grant awards shall be decided and awarded by the Agency.

(e)

Transportation Alternatives grant awards shall be announced annually by the Agency not earlier than December and not later than the following March.

(f) (1)

In fiscal years 2018 and 2019, all Grant Program funds shall be reserved for municipalities for environmental mitigation projects relating to stormwater and highways, including eligible salt and sand shed projects.

(2)

In fiscal years 2020 and 2021, Grant Program funds shall be awarded for any eligible activity and in accordance with the priorities established in subdivision (4) of this subsection.

(3)

In fiscal year 2022 and thereafter, $1,100,000.00 of Grant Program funds, or such lesser sum if all eligible applications amount to less than $1,100,000.00, shall be reserved for municipalities for environmental mitigation projects relating to stormwater and highways, including eligible salt and sand shed projects.

(4)

Regarding Grant Program funds awarded in fiscal years 2020 and 2021, and the balance of Grant Program funds not reserved for environmental mitigation projects in fiscal year 2022 and thereafter, in evaluating applications for Transportation Alternatives grants, the Agency shall give preferential weighting to projects involving as a primary feature a bicycle or pedestrian facility. The degree of preferential weighting and the circumstantial factors sufficient to overcome the weighting shall be in the complete discretion of the Agency.

(g)

The Agency shall develop an outreach and marketing effort designed to provide information to communities with respect to the benefits of participating in the Transportation Alternatives Grant Program. The outreach and marketing activities shall include apprising municipalities of the availability of grants for salt and sand sheds. The outreach effort should be directed to areas of the State historically underserved by this Program.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 56

, § 74, eff. June 4, 2003; amended

2003, No. 160

(Adj. Sess.), § 29, eff. June 9, 2004;

2005, No. 175

(Adj. Sess.), § 63;

2013, No. 12

, § 12;

2015, No. 40

, § 20;

2017, No. 38

, § 7;

2019, No. 59

, § 43.

§ 39.
Agency of Transportation assistance with municipal salt sheds.

The Agency of Transportation shall work with municipalities to provide assistance in designing effective, low-cost enclosures for salt or sand storage, including off-the-shelf designs that incorporate economical construction materials to the extent allowed by the multisector general permit (MSGP) issued for Vermont by the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency.

The Agency shall explore opportunities for collocation of State and municipal salt or sand storage facilities where collocation would be appropriate.

The Agency of Transportation shall pursue requests for bid for bulk purchases of prototype salt and sand enclosures that would be available to municipalities for purchase.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 160

(Adj. Sess.), § 45, eff. June 9, 2004.

§ 40.
Repealed. 2009, No. 123 (Adj. Sess.), § 24(1).

§ 41.
Repealed. 2011, No. 162 (Adj. Sess.), § E.110.

§ 42.
Reports preserved; consolidated transportation report.

Notwithstanding

2 V.S.A. § 20(d)

, the reports or reporting requirements of this section, sections 10g and 12a, and subsections 7(k), 10b(d), 11f(i), and 12b(d) of this title shall be preserved absent specific action by the General Assembly repealing the reports or reporting requirements.

Annually, on or before January 15, the Agency shall submit a consolidated transportation system and activities report to the House and Senate Committees on Transportation. The report shall consist of:

Financial and performance data of all public transit systems, as defined in

24 V.S.A. § 5088(6)

, that receive operating subsidies in any form from the State or federal government, including subsidies related to the Elders and Persons with Disabilities Transportation Program for service and capital equipment. This component of the report shall:

be developed in cooperation with the Public Transit Advisory Council;

be modeled on the Federal Transit Administration’s National Transit Database Program with such modifications as appropriate for the various services and guidance found in the most current State policy plan;

show as a separate category financial and performance data on the Elders and Persons with Disabilities Transportation Program.

Data on pavement conditions of the State highway system.

A description of the conditions of bridges, culverts, and other structures on the State highway system and on town highways.

Department of Motor Vehicles data, including the number of vehicle registrations and licenses issued, revenues by category, transactions by category, commercial motor vehicle statistics, and any other information the Commissioner deems relevant.

A summary of updates to the Agency’s strategic plans and performance measurements used in its strategic plans.

A summary of the statuses of aviation, rail, and public transit programs.

Data and statistics regarding highway safety, including trends in vehicle crashes and fatalities, traffic counts, and trends in vehicle miles traveled.

An overview of operations and maintenance activities, including winter maintenance statistics.

A list of projects for which the construction phase was completed during the most recent construction season.

Such other information that the Secretary determines the Committees on Transportation need to perform their oversight role.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 153

(Adj. Sess.), § 33; amended

2013, No. 12

, § 12a;

2013, No. 167

(Adj. Sess.), § 22;

2017, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 4c, eff. May 21, 2018.

§ 43.
State highway closures.

For purposes of this section, the phrase “planned closure of a State highway” means the closure of a State highway for more than 48 hours for a project that is part of the State’s annual Transportation Program. The phrase does not include emergency projects or closures of 48 hours or less for maintenance work.

Before the planned closure of a State highway, the Agency shall:

contact the legislative body of any municipality affected by the closure to determine whether the legislative body wishes to convene a regional public meeting for the purpose of hearing public concerns regarding the planned closure; and

conduct a regional public meeting if requested by the legislative body of a municipality affected by the closure.

To address concerns raised at a meeting held pursuant to subsection (b) of this section or otherwise to reduce adverse impacts of the planned closure of a State highway, the Agency shall consult with other State agencies and departments, regional chambers of commerce, regional planning commissions, local legislative bodies, emergency medical service organizations, school officials, and area businesses to develop mitigation strategies.

In developing mitigation strategies, the Agency shall consider the need to provide a level of safety for the traveling public comparable to that available on the segment of State highway affected by the planned closure. If the Agency finds town highways unsuitable for a signed detour, the Agency will advise local legislative bodies of the reasons for its determination.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 153

(Adj. Sess.), § 45; amended

2013, No. 12

, § 20.

§ 44.
Statewide Property Parcel Mapping Program.

Purpose. The purpose of the Statewide Property Parcel Mapping Program is to:

develop a statewide property parcel data layer;

ensure regular maintenance, including updates, of the data layer; and

make property parcel data available to State agencies and departments, regional planning commissions, municipalities, and the public.

Property Parcel Data Advisory Board. The Property Parcel Data Advisory Board (Board) is created for the purpose of monitoring the Statewide Property Parcel Mapping Program and making recommendations to the Agency of how the Program can be improved to enhance the usefulness of statewide property parcel data for State agencies and departments, regional planning commissions, municipalities, and the public. The Board shall comprise:

the Secretary of Transportation or designee, who shall serve as chair;

the Secretary of Natural Resources or designee;

the Secretary of Commerce and Community Development or designee;

the Commissioner of Taxes or designee;

a representative of the Vermont Association of Planning and Development Agencies;

a representative of the Vermont League of Cities and Towns; and

a land surveyor licensed under 26 V.S.A. chapter 45 designated by the Vermont Society of Land Surveyors.

Meetings of Board. The Board shall meet at the call of the chair or at the request of a majority of its members. The Agency shall provide administrative assistance to the Board and such other assistance as the Board may require to carry out its duties.

Standards. The Agency shall update the statewide property parcel data layer in accordance with the standards of the Vermont Geographic Information System (VGIS), as specified in

10 V.S.A. § 123

(powers and duties of Vermont Center for Geographic Information).

Funding sources. Federal transportation funds shall be used for the development and operation of the Program. In fiscal year 2018 and in succeeding fiscal years, the Agency shall make every effort to ensure that all State matching funds are provided by other State agencies or external partners, or both, that benefit from the Program.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), § 37.